Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.220

Suspension of allowances during other public aid.

The payment of any retirement allowance to a member who has been retired from service shall be suspended during the time that the beneficiary is in receipt of other pension or of other compensation for state or public service paid from direct or indirect state or municipal taxes or revenues of publicly owned utilities, except as to the amount by which such retirement allowance may exceed such compensation for the same period.

[ 1939 c 207 s 23; RRS s 9592-123.]